Florida, session 2026, SB1530.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 23 24 Section 1.âSection 83.626, Florida Statutes, is created to 25 read: 26 83.626âCourt records of eviction proceedings.â 27 (1)(a)âA person who is a defendant in an eviction 28 proceeding for nonpayment of rent under this part or nonpayment 29 of the lot rental amount under s. 723.061 may file a motion with 30 the court to have the records of such proceeding sealed and to 31 have his or her name substituted with âtenantâ on the progress 32 docket if any of the following conditions is satisfied: 33 1.âThe case was resolved by settlement or stipulation of 34 the parties, and the person has complied with the terms of the 35 agreement. 36 2.âA default judgment was entered against the person, and 37 he or she has satisfied any monetary award included in the 38 judgment. 39 3.âA judgment was entered against the person on the merits, 40 at least 5 years have passed from the date of entry of the 41 judgment, and the person has satisfied any monetary award 42 included in the judgment. 43 4.âA judgment was entered against the person on the merits, 44 and at least 10 years have passed from the date of entry of the 45 judgment. 46 (b)âA person is ineligible for relief under paragraph (a) 47 if he or she has been evicted more than once. 48 (2)âA person seeking relief under subsection (1) must serve 49 a copy of the motion on all parties to the proceeding and must 50 file an affidavit with the court attesting that he or she is not 51 ineligible for such relief under paragraph (1)(b). The court 52 must schedule a hearing if a written objection is filed within 53 30 days after the person serves the motion. If no such objection 54 is timely filed, the court must grant the relief without a 55 hearing. If a timely objection is filed and the court, after a 56 hearing, determines that the person is eligible for relief, the 57 court must grant the relief. 58 (3)âIn an eviction proceeding for nonpayment of rent under 59 this part or for nonpayment of the lot rental amount under s. 60 723.061, if judgment is entered in favor of the person being 61 evicted or if the parties file a joint stipulation requesting 62 relief under this section, the person being evicted is entitled 63 to the substitution of his or her name with âtenantâ on the 64 progress docket without any further motion or hearing thereon. 65 (4)âThe court may not charge a filing or reopening fee for 66 motions filed pursuant to this section. 67 (5)âThis section applies to any judgment entered before, 68 on, or after July 1, 2026. 69 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.